Alaska statutes. Title 35. Public Buildings, Works, and Improvements.
Chapter 05. Administration.

Administrative Code. —

For water and harbors, see 17 AAC 80.

Sec. 35.05.010.
Planning and construction.

The department is responsible for the planning and construction of public works except as provided for court facilities in AS

22.05.025

.
Contracts for planning and construction of public works are governed by AS 36.30 (State Procurement Code).

History.

(§ 1 art III title I ch 152 SLA 1957; am § 2 ch 160 SLA 1980; am § 31 ch 106 SLA 1986)

Sec. 35.05.020.
Regulations.

The department shall adopt regulations that it considers necessary to carry out the purpose of this title.
The regulations may not conflict with AS 36.30 (State Procurement Code) or the regulations adopted by the Department of Administration under that chapter.

History.

(§ 1 art III title I ch 152 SLA 1957; am § 32 ch 106 SLA 1986)

Administrative Code. —

For administration, see 17 AAC 5.

For utility permits, see 17 AAC 15, art. 1.

For utility standards and requirements, see 17 AAC 15, art. 2.

For utility relocation and installation, see 17 AAC 15, art. 3.

For marine highway system procurement procedures, see 17 AAC 70, art. 3.

For harbor and harbor facilities, see 17 AAC 80, art. 1.

For appeals, see 17 AAC 85.

Sec. 35.05.030.
Duties of department.

The department has the following powers and duties:

direct approved public works planning and construction;

employ assistants and employees;

certify and approve vouchers;

prepare a departmental budget;

review the annual public works program.

History.

(§ 2 art IV title I ch 152 SLA 1957)

Sec. 35.05.040.
Powers of department.

The department may

acquire property;

exercise the power of eminent domain;

take immediate possession of real property, or any interest in it under a declaration of taking or by other lawful means;

acquire rights-of-way for present or future use;

dispose of excess property or property rights;

accept and dispose of federal funds or property available for public works construction, maintenance, or equipment;

enter into contracts or agreements relating to public works with the federal government and political subdivisions, and also enter into contracts with a foreign government if approved by the federal government;

exercise any other power necessary to carry out the purpose of this title;

lease or grant land or any interest in land to the Alaska Housing Finance Corporation for a purpose set out in AS

18.55.100

—

18.55.960

on terms and conditions prescribed by the department;

procure directly materials, labor, and contractual services for planning, designing, and constructing public facilities of the state.

History.

(§ 2 art III title I ch 152 SLA 1957; am § 15 ch 99 SLA 1965; am § 3 ch 216 SLA 1975; am § 110 ch 4 FSSLA 1992)

Cross references. —

For provisions relating to disposal of real property acquired under this section, see AS

38.05.030(d)

.

Opinions of attorney general. —

The interaction of AS

38.05.030(b)

,

38.05.035(a)(7)

and (12), AS

35.05.040

(1), and AS

35.20.010

was examined to determine (1) which agency of the state had authority to accept title to land transferred by the federal government and (2) which agency had authority to manage the land, which was conveyed for airport and other purposes.
The division of lands is the proper agency for acceptance of title.
The division of aviation in the (former) Department of Public Works (now the Department of Transportation and Public Facilities) possesses the authority to manage the granted land for airport and directly related purposes while the division of lands possesses the authority to manage the granted land for other public purposes.
April 14, 1977 Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 35.05.050.
Federal aid.

Legislative assent to federal aid for the state, including aid given to the state through a department or agency of the federal government, is given.
The department may apply for, contract, and do all things necessary to cooperate with the United States Government for the construction of public works under federal Acts.

History.

(§ 1 art II title III ch 152 SLA 1957)

Sec. 35.05.060.
State assumption of nonfederal flood control project costs.

To the extent that funds are made available by the legislature, the state shall assume 90 percent of the nonfederal costs of planning, land acquisition, construction, and maintenance of flood control projects authorized within the state by the United States, except that the state shall assume the full share of nonfederally funded costs with respect to those facilities that are primarily state responsibilities, including highways and roads, parks and recreation, and fish and game facilities. The state shall participate in federal flood control projects under this section only as to those projects authorized and approved by the department.

History.

(§ 1 ch 129 SLA 1971; am § 15 ch 9 SLA 2014)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

35.07.010

.
Renumbered in 1987.